Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. In General
§ 21-17-124.
Student electronic writings and other electronic communications; expectation of privacy.

No ownership rights to any electronic writing or other electronic communication created by a student shall be conveyed, transferred or otherwise affected solely as a result of the writing or other communication being stored on an electronic device paid for in whole or in part by the university or transmitted or stored on the university’s network.

Students at the university shall have an expectation of privacy in the electronic writings and other electronic communications created by the student regardless of whether the writing or other communication is stored on an electronic device paid for in whole or in part by the university or transmitted or stored on the university’s network. The university shall not require a student to waive or limit the student’s expectation of privacy specified under this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to writings or other communications:

Publicly disclosed, released or conveyed by the student or otherwise made available for observation by the student in such a manner that a person would not reasonably expect the writing or other communication would remain undisclosed to others;

Accessed by the university in cases where there is a technological requirement to support and maintain the university’s electronic device or network. Writings or other communications viewed during the technological support or maintenance of the electronic device or network shall be limited to only those writings or other communications required to address the specific technical issue and shall not be used or distributed to any other person or entity unless otherwise mandated by federal or state law.

The property rights and expectation of privacy provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to a writing or other communication created by a student who is simultaneously employed by and enrolled at the university if the writing or other communication is created when the person is acting in an official capacity as an employee of the university. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to diminish the property rights or expectation of privacy of persons acting in the capacity of an employee of the university.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Impose, by operation of law, or require the university to accept or prohibit the university from accepting any liability or responsibility for collecting, maintaining, storing or otherwise recording writings and other communications created by a student;

Require the university to establish or prohibit the university from establishing standards on the retention and destruction of student writings and other communications.

For purposes of this section, “student” means any person currently enrolled full time or part time at the university.

History.

2017 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 36, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 21-17-125.
Family medicine resident program education and clinical training; contract for clinical operation; use of University of Wyoming residents, students and faculty.

Whenever the board of trustees deems it in the best interests of the university they may enter into one (1) or more contracts with any person, group, association or corporation for the operation of the family medicine residency program and related functions. As consideration for the operation of the clinical and related functions the contract may provide for:

The lease of appropriate University of Wyoming facilities and equipment;

The services of university employees;

A payment from the university; and

Funding, supplies and equipment.

If the board of trustees deems it in the best interests of the university to enter into one (1) or more contracts for the clinical operations of the family medicine residency program, the university shall ensure that the contract requires:

Provision of a clinic for the university’s family medicine residency program as provided by this section;

To the extent feasible, attainment and maintaining of qualification as a federally qualified health center and performance of the duties required of a federally qualified health center;

Operation of the clinic in a manner required by the accreditation council for graduate medical education, and if deficiencies in operation are identified, development and implementation of a plan to remedy the deficiencies, which plan shall be developed with the participation and approval of the university;

As specified in the contract, reimbursement to the university for the services of University of Wyoming faculty, physician residents, staff and any students who function as clinic medical staff or other staff or who otherwise provide services to the entity with whom the university has contracted. The contract may contain provisions to ensure that this reimbursement does not endanger the clinic’s financial solvency;

Furnishing the university with semiannual reports showing the financial condition of the clinic and providing an accounting of all monies received and expended. The reports shall satisfy accounting standards specified in the contract and shall provide a level of detail specified in the contract, but which is designed to allow public release of the reports without violating the privacy of any patient;

Payment to the university of a percentage of the net revenues derived from operation of all family medicine residency program clinics. The contract may specify:

An allowance for depreciation and improvement of equipment to be deducted from gross revenue before calculating net revenue;

That any equipment purchased pursuant to this provision shall be:

The property of the university; and

Included in the facilities leased to the operator pursuant to this section.

Upon completion or nonrenewal of the contract, return to the university of any funding, supplies, equipment and patient records received from the university to the extent and in the form possible as specified in the contract.

The university may enter into separate contracts for separate facilities, and these contracts may be with multiple entities. The university may enter into separate contracts with other entities to furnish additional training opportunities for family medicine residency program physician residents and other students.

The University of Wyoming family medicine residency program shall include within the university’s biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a report specifying at a minimum:

The financial condition of the clinic and all monies received and expended;

Patient demographics;

Physician resident data;

Federally qualified health center compliance; and

Quality metrics.

History.

2019 ch. 40, § 1, effective February 15, 2019.

Effective date.—

Laws 2019, ch. 40, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

Editor’s note.—

Laws 2019, ch. 40, § 2, provides:

“(a)
If feasible, any contract under this act shall not take effect before July 1, 2019, nor later than July 1, 2020. If it is not feasible to implement the contract by July 1, 2020, it shall be implemented at the earliest practical date after July 1, 2020.

“(b)
Before any contract is signed, not later than October 1, 2019, and again not later than April 30, 2020, the University of Wyoming shall submit a status report on the initial contracts or contract negotiations between the University of Wyoming and the federally qualified health center pursued pursuant to this act to the joint appropriations committee.

“(c)
Any funds remaining at the end of the 2019-2020 biennium in the University of Wyoming family medicine residency program special revenue account or accounts to which clinic revenue for clinical services was deposited are appropriated to the University of Wyoming family medicine residency program for purposes of the family medicine residency program for purposes of enhancing patient care and clinical training consistent with federally qualified health center requirements.

“(d)
If 2019 HB0221 is enacted into law, the agency's general fund and special revenue appropriation for 2020 shall be redesignated as grants and aid expenditure object series funding.”

§ 21-17-126.
University water system.

Subject to title 41 of the Wyoming statutes and notwithstanding any municipal or county ordinance, the University of Wyoming may:

Develop, drill, construct, operate, maintain and use any water line, system, well or works on property owned by the university for the purposes of distributing, providing and using nonpotable water on property owned or leased by the university for miscellaneous use where water is to be used for landscape watering, lawns, athletic fields, trees, shrubs and flowers;

Connect a building, facility, landscape, lot, premises or structure owned by the university to any water line, system, well or works operated, maintained or used by the university.

No city or county shall restrict or prohibit the university from developing, drilling, constructing, operating, maintaining or using any water system independent of the city’s or county’s water system.

History.

2021 ch. 93, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 93, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.